app/Resources/Dictionaries/hyph_fr.dic
UTF-8
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
2'2
2’2
.a4
'a4
’a4
.â4
'â4
’â4
ab2h
.ab3réa
.a1b2r
.ab1ré
'ab3réa
'a1b2r
'ab1ré
’ab3réa
’a1b2r
’ab1ré
ad2h
a1è2d1re
aè1d2r
.ae3s4c2h
'ae3s4c2h
’ae3s4c2h
1alcool
al1co
a2l1al1gi
a1la
.amino1a2c
.a1mi
.ami1no
'amino1a2c
'a1mi
'ami1no
’amino1a2c
’a1mi
’ami1no
.ana3s4t2r
.a1na
'ana3s4t2r
'a1na
’ana3s4t2r
’a1na
1a2nesthé1si
a1ne
anes1t2h
anest1hé
.anti1a2
.an1ti
'anti1a2
'an1ti
’anti1a2
’an1ti
.anti1e2
'anti1e2
’anti1e2
.anti1é2
.anti2en1ne
'anti2en1ne
’anti2en1ne
'anti1é2
’anti1é2
.anti1s2
'anti1s2
’anti1s2
.apo2s3ta
.a1po
'apo2s3ta
'a1po
’apo2s3ta
’a1po
apo2s3t2r
a1po
archi1é2pis
ar1c2h
arc1hi
archié1pi
.as2ta
'as2ta
’as2ta
a2s3t1ro
as1t2r
1ba
1bâ
.bai2se3main
.bai1se
.baise1ma
1be
1bé
1bè
1bê
4be.
4bes.
2bent.
1bi
1bî
.bi1a2c
.bi1a2t
.bi1au
.bio1a2
.bi2s1a2
.bi1u2
1b2l
4b4le.
b1le
4b4les.
2b2lent.
1bo
1bô
1b2r
4b4re.
b1re
4b4res.
2b2rent.
1bu
1bû
1by
1ç
1ca
1câ
ca3ou3t2
1ce
1cé
1cè
1cê
4ce.
4ces.
2cent.
1j
ja3cent.
ja1ce
ac3cent.
ac1ce
é3cent.
é1ce
1mu
munifi3cent.
mu1ni
muni1fi
munifi1ce
1ré
réti3cent.
ré1ti
réti1ce
1p2r
privatdo3cent.
p1ri
pri1va
privat1do
privatdo1ce
inno3cent.
in1no
inno1ce
es3cent.
es1ce
acquies4cent.
ac1q
acquies1ce
is3cent.
is1ce
immis4cent.
im1mi
immis1ce
.c2h4
1c2h
4ch.
2chb
4c4he.
c1he
4c4hes.
2chent.
.chè2vre3feuil1le
.c1hè
.chè1v2r
.chèv1re
.chèvre1fe
.chèvrefeuil2l
2chg
ch2l
4ch4le.
ch1le
4ch4les.
chlo2r3a2c
ch1lo
chlo1ra
chlo2r3é2t
chlo1ré
2chm
2chn
2chp
ch2r
4ch4re.
ch1re
4ch4res.
2chs
2cht
2chw
1ci
1cî
.ci2s1alp
.ci1sa
1c2k
4ck.
2ckb
4c4ke.
c1ke
4c4kes.
2c2kent.
2ckf
2ckg
2c1k3h
2ckp
2cks
2ckt
1c2l
4c4le.
c1le
4c4les.
2c2lent.
1co
1cô
co1acc
co1ac1q
co1a2d
co1ap
co1ar
co1assoc
coas1so
co1assur
coas1su
co1au
co1ax
1cœ
co1é2
co1ef
co1en
co1ex
.con4
.cons4
.contre1s2c
.con1t2r
.cont1re
.cont1re3maît1re
.contre1ma
.contremaî1t2r
co2nurb
co1nu
.co1o2
.co2o3lie
.coo1li
1c2r
4c4re.
c1re
4c4res.
2c2rent.
1cu
1cû
1cy
.cul4
1d2'2
1d2’2
1da
1dâ
.dacryo1a2
.da1c2r
.dac1ry
d1d2h
1de
1dé
1dè
1dê
4de.
4des.
2dent.
déca3dent.
dé1ca
déca1de
é3dent.
é1de
cci3dent.
c1ci
cci1de
inci3dent.
in1ci
inci1de
confi3dent.
con1fi
confi1de
1t2r
tri3dent.
t1ri
tri1de
1di
dissi3dent.
dis1si
dissi1de
chien3dent.
c1hi
chien1de
.ar3dent.
.ar1de
impu3dent.
im1pu
impu1de
pru3dent.
p1ru
pru1de
.dé1a2
.dé1io
.dé1o2
.dé2s
.dé3s2a3c2r
.dé1sa
.dés2a3m
.dé3s2a3tell
.désa1te
.dé3s2as1t2r
.dé3s2c
.dé2s1é2
.dé3s2é3g2r
.dé3s2ensib
.dé1se
.désen1si
.dé3s2ert
.dé3s2exu
.dé2s1i2
.dé3s2i3d
.dé3s2i3g2n
.dé3s2i3li
.dé3s2i3nen
.dési1ne
.dé3s2in1vo
.dé3s2i3r
.dé3s2ist
.dé3s2o3dé
.dé1so
.dé2s1œ
.dé3s2o3l
.dé3s2o3pil
.déso1pi
.dé3s2orm
.dé3s2orp
.dé3s2ou1f2r
.dé3s2p
.dé3s2t
.dé2s1u2n
.dé1su
3d2hal
d1ha
3d2houd
d1ho
1dî
di2s3cop
dis1co
.di1a2cé
.di1a2cid
.dia1ci
.di1ald
.di1a2mi
.di1a2tom
.dia1to
.di1e2n
.di2s3h
2d2lent.
d1le
1do
1dô
1d2r
4d4re.
d1re
4d4res.
2d2rent.
d1s2
1du
1dû
1dy
.dy2s3
.dy2s1a2
.dy2s1i2
.dy2s1o2
.dy2s1u2
.e4
'e4
’e4
.ê4
'ê4
’ê4
.é4
'é4
’é4
.è4
'è4
’è4
éd2hi
1é2drie
é1d2r
éd1ri
1é2drique
édri1q
1é2lec1t2r
é1le
1é2lément
é1lé
élé1me
.e1n1a2
'e1n1a2
’e1n1a2
1é2nerg
é1ne
e2n1i2v2r
e1ni
.e1n1o2
'e1n1o2
’e1n1o2
épi2s3cop
é1pi
épis1co
épi3s4co1pe
e2s3cop
es1co
.eu2r1a2
'eu2r1a2
’eu2r1a2
eu1s2tat
eus1ta
ext1ra1
ex1t2r
extra2c
extra2i
1fa
1fâ
1fe
1fé
1fè
1fê
4fe.
4fes.
2fent.
1fi
1fî
1f2l
4f4le.
f1le
4f4les.
2f2lent.
1fo
1fô
1f2r
4f4re.
f1re
4f4res.
2f2rent.
f1s2
1fu
1fû
1fy
1ga
1gâ
1ge
1gé
1gè
1gê
4ge.
4ges.
2gent.
ré3gent.
ré1ge
entre3gent.
en1t2r
ent1re
entre1ge
indi3gent.
in1di
indi1ge
dili3gent.
di1li
dili1ge
intelli3gent.
in1te
intel1li
intelli1ge
indul3gent.
in1du
indul1ge
1ta
tan3gent.
tan1ge
1ri
rin3gent.
rin1ge
contin3gent.
con1ti
contin1ge
.ar3gent.
.ar1ge
'ar3gent.
'ar1ge
’ar3gent.
’ar1ge
1se
ser3gent.
ser1ge
1te
ter3gent.
ter1ge
résur3gent.
ré1su
résur1ge
1g2ha
1g2he
1g2hi
1g2ho
1g2hy
1gi
1gî
1g2l
4g4le.
g1le
4g4les.
2g2lent.
1g2n
'a2g3nat
'a1g2n
'ag1na
’a2g3nat
’a1g2n
’ag1na
.a2g3nat
.a1g2n
.ag1na
a2g3nos
a1g2n
ag1no
co2g3ni1ti
co1g2n
cog1ni
'i4
'i2g3né
'i1g2n
’i4
’i2g3né
’i1g2n
.i4
.i2g3né
.i1g2n
'i2g3ni
’i2g3ni
.i2g3ni
.ma2g3nici1de
.ma1g2n
.mag1ni
.magni1ci
.ma2g3nificat
.magni1fi
.magnifi1ca
.ma2g3num
.mag1nu
o2g3nomo1ni
o1g2n
og1no
ogno1mo
o2g3no1si
.pro2g3na1t2h
.p2r
.p1ro
.pro1g2n
.prog1na
1pu
pu2g3nab1le
pu1g2n
pug1na
pugna1b2l
pu2g3nac
.sta2g3n
.s1ta
.syn2g3na1t2h
.syn1g2n
.syng1na
1wa
wa2g3n
4g4ne.
g1ne
4g4nes.
2g2nent.
1go
1gô
1g2r
4g4re.
g1re
4g4res.
2g2rent.
1gu
1gû
g1s2
4gue.
4gues.
2guent.
.o4
.on3guent.
.on1gu
'o4
'on3guent.
'on1gu
’o4
’on3guent.
’on1gu
1gy
1ha
1hâ
1he
1hé
1hè
1hê
hémi1é
hé1mi
hémo1p2t
hé1mo
4he.
4hes.
1hi
1hî
1ho
1hô
1hu
1hû
1hy
hype4r1
hype1ra2
hy1pe
hype1re2
hype1ré2
hype1ri2
hype1ro2
hypers2
hype1ru2
hypo1a2
hy1po
hypo1e2
hypo1é2
hypo1i2
hypo1o2
hypo1s2
hypo1u2
.î4
'î4
’î4
i1al1gi
i1arth2r
iar1t2h
i1è2d1re
iè1d2r
il2l
cil3l
rcil4l
r1ci
ucil4l
u1ci
1va
vacil4l
va1ci
gil3l
hil3l
1li
lil3l
l3lion
l1li
1mi
mil3l
mil4let
mil1le
émil4l
é1mi
semil4l
se1mi
rmil4l
r1mi
armil5l
ar1mi
capil3l
ca1pi
1pa
papil3la
pa1pi
papil2l
papil3le
papil3li
papil3lom
papil1lo
pupil3l
pu1pi
1pi
piril3l
pi1ri
1t2h
th2r
thril3l
th1ri
cyril3l
cy1ri
ibril3l
i1b2r
ib1ri
pusil3l
pu1si
.stil3l
.s1ti
distil3l
dis1ti
instil3l
ins1ti
fritil3l
f1ri
fri1ti
boutil3l
bou1ti
vanil3lin
va1ni
vanil2l
vanil1li
vanil3lis
1vi
vil3l
avil4l
a1vi
chevil4l
che1vi
uevil4l
ue1vi
uvil4l
u1vi
xil3l
1informat
in1fo
infor1ma
.i1n1a2
'i1n1a2
’i1n1a2
.in2a3nit
.ina1ni
'in2a3nit
'ina1ni
’in2a3nit
’ina1ni
.in2augur
.inau1gu
'in2augur
'inau1gu
’in2augur
’inau1gu
.i1n1e2
'i1n1e2
’i1n1e2
.i1n1é2
'i1n1é2
’i1n1é2
.in2effab
.inef1fa
'in2effab
'inef1fa
’in2effab
’inef1fa
.in2é3luc1ta
.iné1lu
'in2é3luc1ta
'iné1lu
’in2é3luc1ta
’iné1lu
.in2é3nar1ra
.iné1na
'in2é3nar1ra
'iné1na
’in2é3nar1ra
’iné1na
.in2ept
'in2ept
’in2ept
.in2er
'in2er
’in2er
.in2exo1ra
'in2exo1ra
’in2exo1ra
.i1n1i2
'i1n1i2
’i1n1i2
.in2i3mi1ti
.ini1mi
'in2i3mi1ti
'ini1mi
’in2i3mi1ti
’ini1mi
.in2i3q
'in2i3q
’in2i3q
.in2i3t
'in2i3t
’in2i3t
.i1n1o2
'i1n1o2
’i1n1o2
.in2o3cul
.ino1cu
'in2o3cul
'ino1cu
’in2o3cul
’ino1cu
.in2ond
'in2ond
’in2ond
.in1s2tab
.ins1ta
'in1s2tab
'ins1ta
’in1s2tab
’ins1ta
'inte4r3
'in1te
’inte4r3
’in1te
.inte4r3
.inte1ra2
.in1te
'inte1ra2
’inte1ra2
.inte1re2
'inte1re2
’inte1re2
.inte1ré2
'inte1ré2
’inte1ré2
.inte1ri2
'inte1ri2
’inte1ri2
.inte1ro2
'inte1ro2
’inte1ro2
.inte1ru2
'inte1ru2
’inte1ru2
.inters2
'inters2
’inters2
.i1n1u2
'i1n1u2
’i1n1u2
.in2uit
'in2uit
’in2uit
.in2u3l
'in2u3l
’in2u3l
io1a2ct
i1oxy
i1s2tat
is1ta
2jk
4je.
4jes.
2jent.
1ka
1kâ
1ke
1ké
1kè
1kê
4ke.
4kes.
2kent.
1k2h
4kh.
.k2h4
1ki
1kî
1ko
1kô
1k2r
1ku
1kû
1ky
1la
1lâ
1là
la2w3re
la1w2r
1le
1lé
1lè
1lê
4le.
4les.
2lent.
.ta3lent.
.ta1le
iva3lent.
i1va
iva1le
équiva4lent.
é1q
équi1va
équiva1le
1mo
monova3lent.
mo1no
mono1va
monova1le
1po
polyva3lent.
po1ly
poly1va
polyva1le
1re
re3lent.
re1le
.do3lent.
.do1le
indo3lent.
in1do
indo1le
inso3lent.
in1so
inso1le
1tu
turbu3lent.
tur1bu
turbu1le
1su
succu3lent.
suc1cu
succu1le
fécu3lent.
fé1cu
fécu1le
trucu3lent.
t1ru
tru1cu
trucu1le
opu3lent.
o1pu
opu1le
corpu3lent.
cor1pu
corpu1le
1ru
ru3lent.
ru1le
1s2por
sporu4lent.
s1po
spo1ru
sporu1le
1lî
1lo
1lô
l1s2t
1lu
1lû
1ly
1ma
1mâ
.ma2c3k
.macro1s2c
.ma1c2r
.mac1ro
.ma2l1a2dres
.ma1la
.mala1d2r
.malad1re
.ma2l1a2d1ro
.ma2l1ai1sé
.ma2l1ap
.ma2l1a2v
.ma2l1en
.ma1le
.ma2l1int
.ma1li
.ma2l1oc
.ma1lo
.ma2l1o2d
.ma2r1x
1me
1mé
1mè
1mê
.mé2g1oh
.mé1go
.mé2sa
.mé3san
.mé2s1es
.mé1se
.mé2s1i
.mé2s1u2s
.mé1su
.mé1ta1s2ta
.mé1ta
4me.
4mes.
â2ment.
â1me
da2ment.
da1me
fa2ment.
fa1me
amalga2ment.
a1ma
amal1ga
amalga1me
cla2ment.
c1la
cla1me
1ra
ra2ment.
ra1me
tempéra3ment.
tem1pé
tempé1ra
tempéra1me
ta2ment.
ta1me
testa3ment.
tes1ta
testa1me
1q
qua2ment.
qua1me
è2ment.
è1me
carê2ment.
ca1rê
carê1me
diaphrag2ment.
dia1p2h
diaph2r
diaph1ra
diaphrag1me
1ry
ryth2ment.
ry1t2h
ry2thm
ryth1me
ai2ment.
ai1me
rai3ment.
rai1me
abî2ment.
a1bî
abî1me
éci2ment.
é1ci
éci1me
vidi2ment.
vi1di
vidi1me
subli2ment.
su1b2l
sub1li
subli1me
éli2ment.
é1li
éli1me
reli2ment.
re1li
reli1me
mi2ment.
mi1me
ani2ment.
a1ni
ani1me
1ve
veni2ment.
ve1ni
veni1me
ri2ment.
ri1me
détri3ment.
dé1t2r
dét1ri
détri1me
1nu
nutri3ment.
nu1t2r
nut1ri
nutri1me
inti2ment.
in1ti
inti1me
esti2ment.
es1ti
esti1me
l2ment.
l1me
flam2ment.
f1la
flam1me
gram2ment.
g1ra
gram1me
.gem2ment.
.gem1me
om2ment.
om1me
.com3ment.
.com1me
ô2ment.
ô1me
slalo2ment.
s1la
sla1lo
slalo1me
chro2ment.
ch1ro
chro1me
1to
to2ment.
to1me
ar2ment.
ar1me
.sar3ment.
.sar1me
er2ment.
er1me
antifer3ment.
an1ti
anti1fe
antifer1me
.ser3ment.
.ser1me
fir2ment.
fir1me
or2ment.
or1me
as2ment.
as1me
au2ment.
au1me
écu2ment.
é1cu
écu1me
fu2ment.
fu1me
hu2ment.
hu1me
fichu3ment.
fi1c2h
fic1hu
fichu1me
llu2ment.
l1lu
llu1me
1p2l
plu2ment.
p1lu
plu1me
bou2ment.
bou1me
bru2ment.
b1ru
bru1me
su2ment.
su1me
tu2ment.
tu1me
1mî
.milli1am
.mil3l
.mil1li
1m2né1mo
m1né
1m2nès
m1nè
1m2né1si
1mô
1mœ
.mono1a2
.mo1no
.mono1e2
.mono1é2
.mono1i2
.mono1ï2dé
.mono1o2
.mono1u2
.mono1s2
mon2t3réal
mon1t2r
mont1ré
m1s2
1mû
1my
moye2n1â2g
moye1nâ
1na
1nâ
1ne
1né
1nè
1nê
4ne.
4nes.
2nent.
réma3nent.
ré1ma
réma1ne
imma3nent.
im1ma
imma1ne
1pe
perma3nent.
per1ma
perma1ne
.émi3nent.
.é1mi
.émi1ne
préémi3nent.
p1ré
préé1mi
préémi1ne
proémi3nent.
p1ro
proé1mi
proémi1ne
surémi3nent.
su1ré
suré1mi
surémi1ne
immi3nent.
immi1ne
conti3nent.
conti1ne
perti3nent.
per1ti
perti1ne
absti3nent.
abs1ti
absti1ne
1ni
1nî
1no
1nô
1nœ
.no2n1obs
.no1no
1nû
n3s2at.
n1sa
n3s2ats.
n1x
1ny
'ô4
’ô4
.ô4
o2b3long
o1b2l
ob1lo
1octet
oc1te
o1d2l
o1è2d1re
oè1d2r
o1io1ni
ombud2s3
om1bu
omni1s2
om1ni
o1s2tas
os1ta
o1s2tat
o1s2té1ro
os1té
o1s2tim
os1ti
o1s2tom
os1to
o1s2trad
os1t2r
ost1ra
o1s2tra1tu
o1s2triction
ost1ri
ostric1ti
.oua1ou
'oua1ou
’oua1ou
.ovi1s2c
.o1vi
'ovi1s2c
'o1vi
’ovi1s2c
’o1vi
oxy1a2
1pâ
paléo1é2
pa1lé
.pa2n1a2f
.pa1na
.pa2n1a2mé
.pa2n1a2ra
.pa2n1is
.pa1ni
.pa2n1o2p2h
.pa1no
.pa2n1opt
.pa2r1a2c1he
.pa1ra
.para1c2h
.pa2r1a2c1hè
.para1s2
.pa2r3hé
.pa1r2h
1pé
1pè
1pê
4pe.
4pes.
2pent.
re3pent.
re1pe
.ar3pent.
.ar1pe
'ar3pent.
'ar1pe
’ar3pent.
’ar1pe
ser3pent.
ser1pe
.pen2ta
pe1r3h
pé2nul
pé1nu
.pe4r
.pe1r1a2
.pe1r1e2
.pe1r1é2
.pe1r1i2
.pe1r1o2
.pe1r1u2
pé1r2é2q
pé1ré
.péri1os
.pé1ri
.péri1s2
.péri2s3s
.péri2s3ta
.péri1u2
1p2h
.p2h4
4ph.
.phalan3s2t
.p1ha
.pha1la
4p4he.
p1he
4p4hes.
2phent.
ph2l
4ph4le.
ph1le
4ph4les.
2phn
photo1s2
p1ho
pho1to
ph2r
4ph4re.
ph1re
4ph4res.
2phs
2pht
3ph2ta1lé
ph1ta
3ph2tis
ph1ti
1pî
4p4le.
p1le
4p4les.
2p2lent.
.pluri1a
.p2l
.p1lu
.plu1ri
1p2né
1p2neu
p1ne
1pô
po1ast1re
poas1t2r
poly1a2
poly1e2
poly1é2
poly1è2
poly1i2
poly1o2
poly1s2
poly1u2
.pon2tet
.pon1te
.pos2t3h
.pos2t1in
.pos1ti
.pos2t1o2
.pos2t3r
.post1s2
4p4re.
p1re
4p4res.
2p2rent.
.pré1a2
.p1ré
.pré2a3la
.pré2au
.pré1é2
.pré1e2
.pré1i2
.pré1o2
.pré1u2
.pré1s2
.pro1é2
.pro1s2cé
pro2s3tat
pros1ta
.prou3d2h
1p2sy1c2h
p1sy
.psycho1a2n
.p2sy1c2h
.p1sy
.psyc1ho
1p2tèr
p1tè
1p2tér
p1té
.pud1d2l
1pû
1py
4que.
4ques.
2quent.
é3quent.
élo3quent.
é1lo
élo1q
grandilo3quent.
gran1di
grandi1lo
grandilo1q
1râ
radio1a2
ra1di
1rè
1rê
.ré1a2
.ré2a3le
.ré2a3lis
.réa1li
.ré2a3lit
.ré2aux
.ré1é2
.ré1e2
.ré2el
.ré2er
.ré2èr
.ré1i2
.ré2i3fi
.ré1o2
.re1s2
.re2s3cap
.res1ca
.re2s3ci1si
.res1ci
.re2s3ci1so
.re2s3cou
.res1co
.re2s3c1ri
.res1c2r
.re2s3pect
.res1pe
.re2s3pir
.res1pi
.re2s3plend
.res1p2l
.resp1le
.re2s3pons
.res1po
.re2s3quil
.res1q
.re2s3s
.re2s3t
.re3s4tab
.res1ta
.re3s4tag
.re3s4tand
.re3s4tat
.re3s4tén
.res1té
.re3s4tér
.re3s4tim
.res1ti
.re3s4tip
.re3s4toc
.res1to
.re3s4top
.re3s4t2r
.re4s5trein
.rest1re
.re4s5trict
.rest1ri
.re4s5trin
.re3s4tu
.re3s4ty
.réu2
.ré2uss
.rétro1a2
.ré1t2r
.rét1ro
4re.
4res.
2rent.
.pa3rent.
.pa1re
appa3rent.
ap1pa
appa1re
tran2s3p
transpa3rent.
t1ra
trans1pa
transpa1re
é3rent.
é1re
tor3rent.
tor1re
cur3rent.
cur1re
1r2h
4r4he.
r1he
4r4hes.
2r3heur
2r3hy1d2r
r1hy
1rî
1ro
1rô
1rû
1sa
1sâ
.s2c2h4
1s2ca1p2h
s1ca
1s2clér
s1c2l
sc1lé
1s2cop
s1co
1s2c2h
e2s3c2h
i2s3c1hé
i1s2c2h
i2s3chia
isc1hi
i2s3chio
4s4ch.
4s4c4he.
sc1he
4s4c4hes.
2s2chs
1sé
1sè
1sê
sesqui1a2
ses1q
4se.
4ses.
2sent.
ab3sent.
ab1se
pré3sent.
pré1se
.res3sent.
.res1se
.seu2le
.s2h4
